Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.240

Housing finance program—Report to legislature annually—Implementation.

(1) The commission shall submit to the legislature in its annual report a summary of the progress of the housing finance program developed under RCW 43.180.220. The report shall include, but not be limited to the number of loans made and location of property financed under RCW 43.180.220 and 43.180.230.

(2) The commission shall take such steps as are necessary to ensure that RCW 43.180.220 and 43.180.230 are implemented on June 9, 1994.

[ 1994 c 235 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1994 c 235: See note following RCW 43.180.220.